California, session 20252026, AB2715.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 35160 of the Education Code is amended to read:35160. On and after January 1, 1976, the governing board of any a school district may initiate and carry on any program, activity, or may otherwise act in any a manner which that is not in conflict with or inconsistent with, or preempted by, any law and which that is not in conflict with the purposes for which school districts are established.